New York, session 2025-2026, A10268.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The energy law is amended by adding a new article 13 to 2 read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 13 4 BATTERY ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS 5 Section 13-101. Definitions. 6 13-102. Battery energy storage systems; prohibitions. 7 § 13-101. Definitions. For purposes of this article: 8 1. "Battery energy storage system" shall mean one or more devices, 9 assembled together, capable of storing energy in order to supply elec- 10 trical energy at a future time, not to include a stand-alone twelve-volt 11 car battery or an electric motor vehicle. A battery energy storage 12 system shall be classified as a tier one or tier two battery energy 13 storage system as follows: (a) tier one battery energy storage systems 14 shall possess an aggregate energy capacity less than or equal to six 15 hundred kilowatt hours and, if in a room or enclosed area, consist of 16 only a single energy storage system technology; (b) tier two battery 17 energy storage systems shall possess an aggregate energy capacity great- 18 er than six hundred kilowatt hours or are comprised of more than one 19 storage battery technology in a room or enclosed area. 20 2. "Populated area" shall mean any residentially zoned area, school or 21 hospital. 22 § 13-102. Battery energy storage systems; prohibitions. No tier two 23 battery energy storage system shall be constructed or operated within 24 one thousand feet of a populated area, in a city with a population of 25 one million or more. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14470-01-6